art-pron/art.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology analysis for Romansh: Articles
! Author: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013
! Last Change: July 2015

! The article is explained in Caduff&Caprez in articles 152, 153, 154

Multichar_Symbols +Art +Def +Indef +Masc +Fem +Sg +Pl ^| +Prep +Apo

LEXICON Root
DEFINITE ;
INDEFINITE ;
DEFINITEWITHPREP ;

LEXICON DEFINITE
il+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:il	#;
il+Art+Def+Masc+Sg+Apo:l'	#;
il+Art+Def+Masc+Pl:ils	#;

il+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:la	#;
il+Art+Def+Fem+Sg+Apo:l'	#;
il+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:las	#;

LEXICON INDEFINITE
in+Art+Indef+Masc+Sg:in	#;
in+Art+Indef+Fem+Sg:ina	#;
in+Art+Indef+Fem+Sg+Apo:in'	#;

! The combination of prepositions with feminine articles is not encouraged
! according to Caduff&Caprez, but included for better coverage.
LEXICON DEFINITEWITHPREP
a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:al	#;
a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Pl:als	#;
a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:alla	#;
a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg+Apo:all'	#;
a+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:allas	#;

da+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Sg:dal	#;
da+Prep^|+Art+Def+Masc+Pl:dals	#;
da+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg:dalla	#;
da+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Sg+Apo:dall' #;
da+Prep^|+Art+Def+Fem+Pl:dallas	#;
